Illinois, session 104th, SB3282.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Enterprise Zone Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 655/5.5)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 609.1)7    Sec. 5.5. High Impact Business. 8    (a) In order to respond to unique opportunities to assist 9in the encouragement, development, growth, and expansion of 10the private sector through large-scale large scale investment 11and development projects, the Department is authorized to 12receive and approve applications for the designation of "High 13Impact Businesses" in Illinois, for an initial term of 20 14years with an option for renewal for a term not to exceed 20 15years, subject to the following conditions:16        (1) such applications may be submitted at any time 17    during the year;18        (2) such business is not located, at the time of 19    designation, in an enterprise zone designated pursuant to 20    this Act, except for grocery stores, as defined in the 21    Grocery Initiative Act, and a new battery energy storage 22    solution facility, as defined by subparagraph (I) of 23    paragraph (3) of this subsection (a);  SB3282- 2 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        (3) the business intends to do, commits to do, or is 2    one or more of the following: 3            (A) the business intends to make a minimum 4        investment of $12,000,000 which will be placed in 5        service in qualified property and intends to create 6        500 full-time equivalent jobs at a designated location 7        in Illinois or intends to make a minimum investment of 8        $30,000,000 which will be placed in service in 9        qualified property and intends to retain 1,500 10        full-time retained jobs at a designated location in 11        Illinois. The terms "placed in service" and "qualified 12        property" have the same meanings as described in 13        subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 14        Tax Act; or15            (B) the business intends to establish a new 16        electric generating facility at a designated location 17        in Illinois. "New electric generating facility", for 18        purposes of this Section, means a newly constructed 19        electric generation plant or a newly constructed 20        generation capacity expansion at an existing electric 21        generation plant, including the transmission lines and 22        associated equipment that transfers electricity from 23        points of supply to points of delivery, and for which 24        such new foundation construction commenced not sooner 25        than July 1, 2001. Such facility shall be designed to 26        provide baseload electric generation and shall operate   SB3282- 3 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        on a continuous basis throughout the year; and (i) 2        shall have an aggregate rated generating capacity of 3        at least 1,000 megawatts for all new units at one site 4        if it uses natural gas as its primary fuel and 5        foundation construction of the facility is commenced 6        on or before December 31, 2004, or shall have an 7        aggregate rated generating capacity of at least 400 8        megawatts for all new units at one site if it uses coal 9        or gases derived from coal as its primary fuel and 10        shall support the creation of at least 150 new 11        Illinois coal mining jobs, or (ii) shall be funded 12        through a federal Department of Energy grant before 13        December 31, 2010 and shall support the creation of 14        Illinois coal mining jobs, or (iii) shall use coal 15        gasification or integrated gasification-combined cycle 16        units that generate electricity or chemicals, or both, 17        and shall support the creation of Illinois coal mining 18        jobs. The term "placed in service" has the same 19        meaning as described in subsection (h) of Section 201 20        of the Illinois Income Tax Act; or21            (B-5) the business intends to establish a new 22        gasification facility at a designated location in 23        Illinois. As used in this Section, "new gasification 24        facility" means a newly constructed coal gasification 25        facility that generates chemical feedstocks or 26        transportation fuels derived from coal (which may   SB3282- 4 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        include, but are not limited to, methane, methanol, 2        and nitrogen fertilizer), that supports the creation 3        or retention of Illinois coal mining jobs, and that 4        qualifies for financial assistance from the Department 5        before December 31, 2010. A new gasification facility 6        does not include a pilot project located within 7        Jefferson County or within a county adjacent to 8        Jefferson County for synthetic natural gas from coal; 9        or10            (C) the business intends to establish production 11        operations at a new coal mine, re-establish production 12        operations at a closed coal mine, or expand production 13        at an existing coal mine at a designated location in 14        Illinois not sooner than July 1, 2001; provided that 15        the production operations result in the creation of 16        150 new Illinois coal mining jobs as described in 17        subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this Section, and further 18        provided that the coal extracted from such mine is 19        utilized as the predominant source for a new electric 20        generating facility. The term "placed in service" has 21        the same meaning as described in subsection (h) of 22        Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act; or23            (D) the business intends to construct new 24        transmission facilities or upgrade existing 25        transmission facilities at designated locations in 26        Illinois, for which construction commenced not sooner   SB3282- 5 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        than July 1, 2001. For the purposes of this Section, 2        "transmission facilities" means transmission lines 3        with a voltage rating of 115 kilovolts or above, 4        including associated equipment, that transfer 5        electricity from points of supply to points of 6        delivery and that transmit a majority of the 7        electricity generated by a new electric generating 8        facility designated as a High Impact Business in 9        accordance with this Section. The term "placed in 10        service" has the same meaning as described in 11        subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 12        Tax Act; or13            (E) the business intends to establish a new wind 14        power facility at a designated location in Illinois 15        and the municipality in which the wind power facility 16        will be located (or the county in which the wind power 17        facility will be located, if the facility will be 18        located in an unincorporated area of the county) 19        approves, in writing, the designation of the business 20        as a high impact business. For purposes of this 21        Section, "new wind power facility" means a newly 22        constructed electric generation facility, a newly 23        constructed expansion of an existing electric 24        generation facility, or the replacement of an existing 25        electric generation facility, including the demolition 26        and removal of an electric generation facility   SB3282- 6 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        irrespective of whether it will be replaced, placed in 2        service or replaced on or after July 1, 2009, that 3        generates electricity using wind energy devices, and 4        such facility shall be deemed to include any permanent 5        structures associated with the electric generation 6        facility and all associated transmission lines, 7        substations, and other equipment related to the 8        generation of electricity from wind energy devices. 9        For purposes of this Section, "wind energy device" 10        means any device, with a nameplate capacity of at 11        least 0.5 megawatts, that is used in the process of 12        converting kinetic energy from the wind to generate 13        electricity; or 14            (E-5) the business intends to establish a new 15        utility-scale solar facility at a designated location 16        in Illinois and the municipality in which the solar 17        facility will be located (or the county in which the 18        solar facility will be located, if the facility will 19        be located in an unincorporated area of the county) 20        approves, in writing, the designation of the business 21        as a high impact business. For purposes of this 22        Section, "new utility-scale solar power facility" 23        means a newly constructed electric generation 24        facility, or a newly constructed expansion of an 25        existing electric generation facility, placed in 26        service on or after July 1, 2021, that (i) generates   SB3282- 7 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        electricity using photovoltaic cells and (ii) has a 2        nameplate capacity that is greater than 5,000 3        kilowatts, and such facility shall be deemed to 4        include all associated transmission lines, 5        substations, energy storage facilities, and other 6        equipment related to the generation and storage of 7        electricity from photovoltaic cells; or 8            (F) the business commits to (i) make a minimum 9        investment of $500,000,000, which will be placed in 10        service in a qualified property, (ii) create 125 11        full-time equivalent jobs at a designated location in 12        Illinois, (iii) establish a fertilizer plant at a 13        designated location in Illinois that complies with the 14        set-back standards as described in Table 1: Initial 15        Isolation and Protective Action Distances in the 2012 16        Emergency Response Guidebook published by the United 17        States Department of Transportation, (iv) pay a 18        prevailing wage for employees at that location who are 19        engaged in construction activities, and (v) secure an 20        appropriate level of general liability insurance to 21        protect against catastrophic failure of the fertilizer 22        plant or any of its constituent systems; in addition, 23        the business must agree to enter into a construction 24        project labor agreement including provisions 25        establishing wages, benefits, and other compensation 26        for employees performing work under the project labor   SB3282- 8 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        agreement at that location; for the purposes of this 2        Section, "fertilizer plant" means a newly constructed 3        or upgraded plant utilizing gas used in the production 4        of anhydrous ammonia and downstream nitrogen 5        fertilizer products for resale; for the purposes of 6        this Section, "prevailing wage" means the hourly cash 7        wages plus fringe benefits for training and 8        apprenticeship programs approved by the U.S. 9        Department of Labor, Bureau of Apprenticeship and 10        Training, health and welfare, insurance, vacations and 11        pensions paid generally, in the locality in which the 12        work is being performed, to employees engaged in work 13        of a similar character on public works; this paragraph 14        (F) applies only to businesses that submit an 15        application to the Department within 60 days after 16        July 25, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 17        98-109); or 18            (G) the business intends to establish a new 19        cultured cell material food production facility at a 20        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 21        paragraph (G):22            "Cultured cell material food production facility" 23        means a facility (i) at which cultured animal cell 24        food is developed using animal cell culture 25        technology, (ii) at which production processes occur 26        that include the establishment of cell lines and cell   SB3282- 9 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        banks, manufacturing controls, and all components and 2        inputs, and (iii) that complies with all existing 3        registrations, inspections, licensing, and approvals 4        from all applicable and participating State and 5        federal food agencies, including the Department of 6        Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, and the 7        United States Food and Drug Administration, to ensure 8        that all food production is safe and lawful under 9        provisions of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act 10        related to the development, production, and storage of 11        cultured animal cell food.12            "New cultured cell material food production 13        facility" means a newly constructed cultured cell 14        material food production facility that is placed in 15        service on or after June 7, 2023 (the effective date of 16        Public Act 103-9) or a newly constructed expansion of 17        an existing cultured cell material food production 18        facility, in a controlled environment, when the 19        improvements are placed in service on or after June 7, 20        2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-9); or 21            (H) the business is an existing or planned grocery 22        store, as that term is defined in Section 5 of the 23        Grocery Initiative Act, and receives financial support 24        under that Act within the 10 years before submitting 25        its application under this Act; or 26            (I) the business intends to establish a new   SB3282- 10 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        battery energy storage solution facility at a 2        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 3        paragraph (I):4            "New battery energy storage solution facility" 5        means a newly constructed battery energy storage 6        facility, a newly constructed expansion of an existing 7        battery energy storage facility, or the replacement of 8        an existing battery energy storage facility that 9        stores electricity using battery devices and other 10        means. "New battery energy storage solution facility" 11        includes any permanent structures associated with the 12        new battery energy storage facility and all associated 13        transmission lines, substations, and other equipment 14        that is related to the storage and transmission of 15        electric power and that has a capacity of not less than 16        20 megawatt and storage capability of not less than 40 17        megawatt hours of energy; or 18            (J) the business intends to construct a new high 19        voltage direct current converter station at a 20        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 21        paragraph, "high voltage direct current converter 22        station" has the same meaning given to that term in 23        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; or 24            (K) the business intends to construct a new high 25        voltage direct current converter station facility at a 26        designated location in Illinois. As used in this   SB3282- 11 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1        paragraph, "high voltage direct current converter 2        station" has the same meaning given to that term in 3        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; and 4        (4) no later than 90 days after an application is 5    submitted, the Department shall notify the applicant of 6    the Department's determination of the qualification of the 7    proposed High Impact Business under this Section.8    (b) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses 9pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this Section shall 10qualify for the credits and exemptions described in the 11following Acts: Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the 12Public Utilities Act, subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 13Illinois Income Tax Act, and Section 1d of the Retailers' 14Occupation Tax Act; provided that these credits and exemptions 15described in these Acts shall not be authorized until the 16minimum investments set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this 17Section have been placed in service in qualified properties 18and, in the case of the exemptions described in the Public 19Utilities Act and Section 1d of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 20Act, the minimum full-time equivalent jobs or full-time 21retained jobs set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this 22Section have been created or retained. Businesses designated 23as High Impact Businesses under this Section shall also 24qualify for the exemption described in Section 5l of the 25Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. The credit provided in 26subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act   SB3282- 12 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1shall be applicable to investments in qualified property as 2set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this Section.3    (b-5) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses 4pursuant to subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(B-5), (a)(3)(C), 5(a)(3)(D), (a)(3)(G), (a)(3)(H), and (a)(3)(K) of this Section 6shall qualify for the credits and exemptions described in the 7following Acts: Section 51 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 8Act, Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the Public 9Utilities Act, and subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 10Illinois Income Tax Act; however, the credits and exemptions 11authorized under Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the 12Public Utilities Act, and subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 13Illinois Income Tax Act shall not be authorized until the new 14electric generating facility, the new gasification facility, 15the new transmission facility, the new, expanded, or reopened 16coal mine, the new cultured cell material food production 17facility, or the existing or planned grocery store is 18operational, except that a new electric generating facility 19whose primary fuel source is natural gas is eligible only for 20the exemption under Section 5l of the Retailers' Occupation 21Tax Act.22    (b-6) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses on 23or before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 24104th General Assembly pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(E), 25(a)(3)(E-5), (A)(3)(I), or (a)(3)(J) of this Section shall 26qualify for the exemptions described in Section 5l of the   SB3282- 13 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1Retailers' Occupation Tax Act; any business so designated as a 2High Impact Business being, for purposes of this Section, a 3"Wind Energy Business". 4    (b-7) Beginning on January 1, 2021, businesses designated 5as High Impact Businesses by the Department shall qualify for 6the High Impact Business construction jobs credit under 7subsection (h-5) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act 8if the business meets the criteria set forth in subsection (i) 9of this Section. The total aggregate amount of credits awarded 10under the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 11shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 12    (c) High Impact Businesses located in federally designated 13foreign trade zones or sub-zones are also eligible for 14additional credits, exemptions and deductions as described in 15the following Acts: Section 9-221 and Section 9-222.1 of the 16Public Utilities Act; and subsection (g) of Section 201, and 17Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.18    (d) Existing Except for businesses contemplated under 19subdivision (a)(3)(E), (a)(3)(E-5), (a)(3)(G), (a)(3)(H), 20(A)(3)(I), (a)(3)(J), or (a)(3)(K) of this Section, existing 21Illinois businesses which apply for designation as a High 22Impact Business must provide the Department with the 23prospective plan for which 1,500 full-time retained jobs would 24be eliminated in the event that the business is not 25designated.26    (e) New Except for new businesses contemplated under   SB3282- 14 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1subdivision (a)(3)(E), subdivision (a)(3)(G), subdivision 2(a)(3)(H), or subdivision (a)(3)(J) of this Section, new 3proposed facilities which apply for designation as High Impact 4Business must provide the Department with proof of alternative 5non-Illinois sites which would receive the proposed investment 6and job creation in the event that the business is not 7designated as a High Impact Business.8    (f) If Except for businesses contemplated under 9subdivision (a)(3)(E), subdivision (a)(3)(G), subdivision 10(a)(3)(H), subdivision (a)(3)(J), or (a)(3)(K) of this 11Section, in the event that a business is designated a High 12Impact Business and it is later determined after reasonable 13notice and an opportunity for a hearing as provided under the 14Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, that the business would 15have placed in service in qualified property the investments 16and created or retained the requisite number of jobs without 17the benefits of the High Impact Business designation, the 18Department shall be required to immediately revoke the 19designation and notify the Director of the Department of 20Revenue who shall begin proceedings to recover all wrongfully 21exempted State taxes with interest.22    (g) The Department shall revoke a High Impact Business 23designation if the participating business fails to comply with 24the terms and conditions of the designation.25    (h) Prior to designating a business, the Department shall 26provide the members of the General Assembly and Commission on   SB3282- 15 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1Government Forecasting and Accountability with a report 2setting forth the terms and conditions of the designation and 3guarantees that have been received by the Department in 4relation to the proposed business being designated.5    (i) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. 6Beginning on January 1, 2021, a High Impact Business may 7receive a tax credit against the tax imposed under subsections 8(a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act in an 9amount equal to 50% of the amount of the incremental income tax 10attributable to High Impact Business construction jobs credit 11employees employed in the course of completing a High Impact 12Business construction jobs project. However, the High Impact 13Business construction jobs credit may equal 75% of the amount 14of the incremental income tax attributable to High Impact 15Business construction jobs credit employees if the High Impact 16Business construction jobs credit project is located in an 17underserved area. 18    The Department shall certify to the Department of Revenue: 19(1) the identity of taxpayers that are eligible for the High 20Impact Business construction jobs credit; and (2) the amount 21of High Impact Business construction jobs credits that are 22claimed pursuant to subsection (h-5) of Section 201 of the 23Illinois Income Tax Act in each taxable year. 24    As used in this subsection (i):25    "High Impact Business construction jobs credit" means an 26amount equal to 50% (or 75% if the High Impact Business   SB3282- 16 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1construction project is located in an underserved area) of the 2incremental income tax attributable to High Impact Business 3construction job employees. The total aggregate amount of 4credits awarded under the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of 5Public Act 101-9) shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State 6fiscal year7    "High Impact Business construction job employee" means a 8laborer or worker who is employed by a contractor or 9subcontractor in the actual construction work on the site of a 10High Impact Business construction job project.11    "High Impact Business construction jobs project" means 12building a structure or building or making improvements of any 13kind to real property, undertaken and commissioned by a 14business that was designated as a High Impact Business by the 15Department. The term "High Impact Business construction jobs 16project" does not include the routine operation, routine 17repair, or routine maintenance of existing structures, 18buildings, or real property.19    "Incremental income tax" means the total amount withheld 20during the taxable year from the compensation of High Impact 21Business construction job employees.22    "Underserved area" means a geographic area that meets one 23or more of the following conditions:24        (1) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 25    according to the latest American Community Survey; 26        (2) 35% or more of the families with children in the   SB3282- 17 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1    area are living below 130% of the poverty line, according 2    to the latest American Community Survey; 3        (3) at least 20% of the households in the area receive 4    assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 5    Program (SNAP); or 6        (4) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 7    determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 8    Security, that is more than 120% of the national 9    unemployment average, as determined by the U.S. Department 10    of Labor, for a period of at least 2 consecutive calendar 11    years preceding the date of the application. 12    (j) (Blank). 13    (j-5) Annually, until construction is completed, a company 14seeking High Impact Business Construction Job credits shall 15submit a report that, at a minimum, describes the projected 16project scope, timeline, and anticipated budget. Once the 17project has commenced, the annual report shall include actual 18data for the prior year as well as projections for each 19additional year through completion of the project. The 20Department shall issue detailed reporting guidelines 21prescribing the requirements of construction-related reports. 22    In order to receive credit for construction expenses, the 23company must provide the Department with evidence that a 24certified third-party executed an Agreed-Upon Procedure (AUP) 25verifying the construction expenses or accept the standard 26construction wage expense estimated by the Department.   SB3282- 18 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1    Upon review of the final project scope, timeline, budget, 2and AUP, the Department shall issue a tax credit certificate 3reflecting a percentage of the total construction job wages 4paid throughout the completion of the project. 5    (k) Upon 7 business days' notice, each taxpayer shall make 6available to each State agency and to federal, State, or local 7law enforcement agencies and prosecutors for inspection and 8copying at a location within this State during reasonable 9hours, the report under subsection (j-5). 10    (l) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 11102-1125, other than the changes in subsection (a), apply to 12High Impact Businesses that submit applications on or after 13February 3, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1125). 14(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-561, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-595, eff. 6-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 162-20-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25; revised 12-12-25.) 17    Section 10. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 18Section 2 as follows: 19    (820 ILCS 130/2)20    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 21mechanics, and other workers employed in any public works, as 22hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 23contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 24repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment   SB3282- 19 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1whether owned, leased, or rented.2    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 3otherwise:4    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 5demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 6out of public funds. "Public works" as defined herein includes 7all projects financed in whole or in part with bonds, grants, 8loans, or other funds made available by or through the State or 9any of its political subdivisions, including, but not limited 10to: bonds issued under the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act 11(Article 11, Division 74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the 12Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance 13Authority Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 14or the Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made 15available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other 16funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront Development 17Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 18Act; or funds from the Fund for Illinois' Future under Section 196z-47 of the State Finance Act, funds for school construction 20under Section 5 of the General Obligation Bond Act, funds 21authorized under Section 3 of the School Construction Bond 22Act, funds for school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of 23the State Finance Act, and funds for transportation purposes 24under Section 4 of the General Obligation Bond Act. "Public 25works" also includes all federal construction projects 26administered or controlled by a public body if the prevailing   SB3282- 20 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1rate of wages is equal to or greater than the prevailing wage 2determination by the United States Secretary of Labor for the 3same locality for the same type of construction used to 4classify the federal construction project. "Public works" also 5includes (i) all projects financed in whole or in part with 6funds from the Environmental Protection Agency under the 7Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which 8there is no project labor agreement; (ii) all work performed 9pursuant to a public private agreement under the Public 10Private Agreements for the Illiana Expressway Act or the 11Public-Private Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act; 12(iii) all projects undertaken under a public-private agreement 13under the Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act 14or the Department of Natural Resources World Shooting and 15Recreational Complex Act; and (iv) all transportation 16facilities undertaken under a design-build contract or a 17Construction Manager/General Contractor contract under the 18Innovations for Transportation Infrastructure Act. "Public 19works" also includes all projects at leased facility property 20used for airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local 21Government Facility Lease Act. "Public works" also includes 22the construction of a new wind power facility by a business 23designated on or before the effective date of this amendatory 24Act of the 104th General Assembly as a High Impact Business or 25under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 26Act, the construction of a new utility-scale solar power   SB3282- 21 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1facility by a business designated on or before the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly as a 3High Impact Business under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the 4Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, the construction of a new 5battery energy storage solution facility by a business 6designated as a High Impact Business under Section 75.5(a)(3)(I) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, and the 8construction of a high voltage direct current converter 9station by a business designated as a High Impact Business 10under Section 5.5(a)(3)(J) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 11Act. "Public works" also includes electric vehicle charging 12station projects financed pursuant to the Electric Vehicle Act 13and renewable energy projects required to pay the prevailing 14wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency Act. "Public works" 15also includes power washing projects by a public body or paid 16for wholly or in part out of public funds in which steam or 17pressurized water, with or without added abrasives or 18chemicals, is used to remove paint or other coatings, oils or 19grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface or to prepare a 20surface for a coating. "Public works" also includes all 21electric transmission systems projects subject to the Electric 22Transmission Systems Construction Standards Act. "Public 23works" does not include work done directly by any public 24utility company, whether or not done under public supervision 25or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of public 26funds. "Public works" also includes construction projects   SB3282- 22 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1performed by a third party contracted by any public utility, 2as described in subsection (a) of Section 2.1, in public 3rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the Public 4Utilities Act, whether or not done under public supervision or 5direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. 6"Public works" also includes construction projects that exceed 715 aggregate miles of new fiber optic cable, performed by a 8third party contracted by any public utility, as described in 9subsection (b) of Section 2.1, in public rights-of-way, as 10defined in Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, whether 11or not done under public supervision or direction, or paid for 12wholly or in part out of public funds. "Public works" also 13includes any corrective action performed pursuant to Title XVI 14of the Environmental Protection Act for which payment from the 15Underground Storage Tank Fund is requested. "Public works" 16also includes all construction projects involving fixtures or 17permanent attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by 18a public body, including street light poles, traffic light 19poles, and other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under 20public supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part 21out of public funds, unless the project is performed by 22employees employed directly by the public body. "Public works" 23also includes work performed subject to the Mechanical 24Insulation Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" 25also includes the removal, hauling, and transportation of 26biosolids, lime sludge, and lime residue from a water   SB3282- 23 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1treatment plant or facility and the disposal of biosolids, 2lime sludge, and lime residue removed from a water treatment 3plant or facility at a landfill. "Public works" also includes 4sewer inspection projects that use a closed-circuit television 5to identify issues in a sewer system, such as cracks in pipes, 6root intrusion, blockages, or other structural damage. "Public 7works" does not include projects undertaken by the owner at an 8owner-occupied single-family residence or at an owner-occupied 9unit of a multi-family residence. "Public works" does not 10include work performed for soil and water conservation 11purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not done under 12public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out of public 13funds, done directly by an owner or person who has legal 14control of those lands. 15    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 16laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 17repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 18whether owned, leased, or rented.19    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 20public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 21available in the county a sufficient number of competent 22skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 23public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 24other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 25is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 26in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with   SB3282- 24 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 2Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 3of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 4construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 5workers may be accessible for work on such construction.6    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 7commission of the State or any political subdivision or 8department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 9in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 10town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 11reclamation improvement or other district and every other 12political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 13whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 14operates under a special charter or not.15    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 16exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 17or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 18    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 19"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 20wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 21full journeyman annualized fringe benefits for training and 22apprenticeship programs registered with the Office of 23Apprenticeship within the U.S. Department of Labor's 24Employment and Training Administration with full journeymen 25annualized fringe benefits for health and welfare, insurance, 26vacations, and pensions paid generally, in the locality in   SB3282- 25 -LRB104 19264 HLH 32710 b1which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 2work of a similar character on public works.3(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 4103-346, eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 58-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 2-20-25; 104-17, 6eff. 7-1-26 (see Section 35-5 of P.A. 104-434 for effective 7date of P.A. 104-17); 104-23, eff. 6-30-25; 104-160, eff. 88-14-25; revised 12-2-25.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.